Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB261.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 161 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
SECTION 1. PURPOSE
The purpose of this compact is to facilitate the interstate practice of school psychology
in educational or school settings, and in so doing to improve the availability of school
psychological services to the public. This compact is intended to establish a pathway to
allow school psychologists to obtain equivalent licenses to provide school psychological
services in any member state. In this way, this compact shall enable the member states
to ensure that safe and effective school psychological services are available and
delivered by appropriately qualified professionals in their educational settings.
To facilitate the objectives described above, this compact:
A. Enables school psychologists who qualify for receipt of an equivalent license to
practice in other member states without first satisfying burdensome and
duplicative requirements;
B. Promotes the mobility of school psychologists between and among the member
states in order to address workforce shortages and to ensure that safe and reliable
school psychological services are available in each member state;
C. Enhances the public accessibility of school psychological services by increasing
the availability of qualified, licensed school psychologists through the
establishment of an efficient and streamlined pathway for licensees to practice in
other member states;
D. Preserves and respects the authority of each member state to protect the health
and safety of its residents by ensuring that only qualified, licensed professionals
are authorized to provide school psychological services within that state;
E. Requires school psychologists practicing within a member state to comply with
Page 1 of 26
XXXX 11/24/2025 9:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 492
the scope of practice laws present in the state where the school psychological
services are being provided;
F. Promotes cooperation between the member states in regulating the practice of
school psychology within those states; and
G. Facilitates the relocation of military members and their spouses who are licensed
to provide school psychological services.
SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS
A. "Active military member" means any person with full-time duty status in the
Armed Forces of the United States, including members of the National Guard
and Reserve;
B. "Adverse action" means disciplinary action or encumbrance imposed on a
license by a state licensing authority;
C. "Alternative program" means a non-disciplinary, prosecutorial diversion,
monitoring, or practice remediation process entered into in lieu of an adverse
action which is applicable to a school psychologist and approved by the state
licensing authority of a member state in which the participating school
psychologist is licensed. This includes but is not limited to programs to which
licensees with substance abuse or addiction issues may be referred in lieu of an
adverse action;
D. "Commissioner" means the individual appointed by a member state to serve as
the representative to the commission for that member state;
E. "Compact" means this School Psychologist Interstate Licensure Compact;
F. "Continuing professional education" means a requirement, imposed by a
member state as a condition of license renewal to provide evidence of successful
participation in professional educational activities relevant to the provision of
school psychological services;
G. "Criminal background check" means the submission of fingerprints or other
Page 2 of 26
XXXX 11/24/2025 9:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 492
biometric information for a license applicant for the purpose of obtaining that
applicant’s criminal history record information, as defined in 28 C.F.R. sec.
20.3(d), and the state’s criminal history record repository as defined in 28 C.F.R.
sec. 20.3(f);
H. "Doctoral level degree" means a graduate degree program that consists of at
least ninety (90) graduate semester hours in the field of school psychology
including a supervised internship;
I. "Encumbered license" means a license that a state licensing authority has
limited in any way other than through an alternative program, including
temporary or provisional licenses;
J. "Executive committee" means the commission’s chair, vice chair, secretary, and
treasurer and any other commissioners as may be determined by commission rule
or bylaw;
K. "Equivalent license" means a license to practice school psychology which a
member state has identified as a license which may be provided to school
psychologists from other member states pursuant to this compact;
L. "Home state" means the member state that issued the home state license to the
licensee and is the licensee’s primary state of practice;
M. "Home state license" means the license that is not an encumbered license issued
by the home state to provide school psychological services;
N. "License" means a current license, certification, or other authorization granted
by a member state’s licensing authority that permits an individual to provide
school psychological services;
O. "Licensee" means an individual who holds a license from a member state to
provide school psychological services;
P. "Member state" means a state that has enacted the compact and been admitted to
the commission in accordance with the provisions herein and commission rules;
Page 3 of 26
XXXX 11/24/2025 9:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 492
Q. "Model compact" means the model language for the School Psychologist
Interstate Licensure Compact on file with the Council of State Governments or
other entity as designated by the commission;
R. "Practice of school psychology" means the delivery of school psychological
services;
S. "Qualifying national exam" means a national licensing examination endorsed by
the National Association of School Psychologists and any other exam as
approved by the rules of the commission;
T. "Qualifying school psychologist education program" means an education
program which awards a specialist-level or doctoral-level degree or equivalent
upon completion and is approved by the rules of the commission as meeting the
necessary minimum educational standards to ensure that its graduates are ready,
qualified, and able to engage in the practice of school psychology;
U. "Remote state" means a member state other than the home state where a licensee
holds a license through the compact;
V. "Rule" means a regulation promulgated by an entity, including but not limited to
the commission and the state licensing authority of each member state, that has
the force of law;
W. "School psychological services" means academic, mental and behavioral health
services, including assessment, prevention, consultation and collaboration,
intervention, and evaluation provided by a school psychologist in a school, as
outlined in applicable professional standards as determined by commission rule;
X. "School psychologist" means an individual who has met the requirements to
obtain a home state license that legally conveys the professional title of school
psychologist, or its equivalent as determined by the rules of the commission;
Y. "School Psychologist Interstate Licensure Compact Commission" or
"commission" means the joint government agency established by this compact
Page 4 of 26
XXXX 11/24/2025 9:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 492
whose membership consists of representatives from each member state that has
enacted the compact, and as further described in Section 7 of this compact;
Z. "Scope of practice" means the procedures, actions, and processes a school
psychologist licensed in a state is permitted to undertake in that state and the
circumstances under which that licensee is permitted to undertake those
procedures, actions, and processes. Such procedures, actions, and processes, and
the circumstances under which they may be undertaken, may be established
through means including but not limited to statute, regulations, case law, and
other processes available to the state licensing authority or other government
agency;
AA. "Specialist-level degree" means a degree program that requires at least sixty (60)
graduate semester hours or equivalent in the field of school psychology including
a supervised internship;
BB. "State" means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of the United States
of America;
CC. "State licensing authority" means a member state’s regulatory body responsible
for issuing licenses or otherwise overseeing the practice of school psychology;
DD. "State specific requirement" means a requirement for licensure covered in
coursework or examination that includes content of unique interest to the state;
and
EE. "Unencumbered license" means a license that authorizes a licensee to engage in
the full and unrestricted practice of school psychology.
SECTION 3. STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT
A. To be eligible to join this compact, and to maintain eligibility as a member state, a
state must:
1. Enact a compact statute that is not materially different from the model
compact as defined in the commission’s rules;
Page 5 of 26
XXXX 11/24/2025 9:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 492
2. Participate in the sharing of information with other member states as
reasonably necessary to accomplish the objectives of this compact, and as
further defined in Section 8 of this compact;
3. Identify and maintain with the commission a list of equivalent licenses
available to licensees who hold a home state license under this compact;
4. Have a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating complaints
about licensees;
5. Notify the commission, in compliance with the terms of the compact and the
commission’s rules, of any adverse action taken against a licensee, or of the
availability of investigative information which relates to a licensee or
applicant for licensure;
6. Require that applicants for a home state license have:
a. Taken and passed a qualifying national exam as defined by the rules
of the commission;
b. Completed a minimum of one thousand two hundred (1,200) hours of
supervised internship, of which at least six hundred (600) hours must
have been completed in a school, prior to being approved for
licensure; and
c. Graduated from a qualifying school psychologist education program;
and
7. Comply with the terms of this compact and the rules of the commission.
B. Each member state shall grant an equivalent license to practice school
psychology in that state upon application by a licensee who satisfies the criteria of
Section 4.A. of this compact. Each member state shall grant renewal of the
equivalent license to a licensee who satisfies the criteria of Section 4.B. of this
compact.
C. Member states may set and collect a fee for granting an equivalent license.
Page 6 of 26
XXXX 11/24/2025 9:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 492
SECTION 4. SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGIST PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT
A. To obtain and maintain an equivalent license from a remote state under this
compact, a licensee must:
1. Hold and maintain an active home state license;
2. Satisfy any applicable state specific requirements established by the member
state after an equivalent license is granted;
3. Complete any administrative or application requirements which the
commission may establish by rule, and pay any associated fees;
4. Complete any requirements for renewal in the home state, including
applicable continuing professional education requirements; and
5. Upon their application to receive a license under this compact, undergo a
criminal background check in the member state in which the equivalent
license is sought in accordance with the laws and regulations of such
member state.
B. To renew an equivalent license in a member state other than the home state, a
licensee must only apply for renewal, complete a background check, and pay
renewal fees as determined by the licensing authority.
SECTION 5. ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBERS OR THEIR SPOUSES
A licensee who is an active military member or is the spouse of an active military
member shall be deemed to hold a home state license in any of the following locations:
A. The licensee’s permanent residence;
B. A member state that is the licensee’s primary state of practice; or
C. A member state where the licensee has relocated pursuant to a permanent change
of station (PCS).
SECTION 6. DISCIPLINE AND ADVERSE ACTIONS
A. Nothing in this compact shall be deemed or construed to limit the authority of a
member state to investigate or impose disciplinary measures on licensees
Page 7 of 26
XXXX 11/24/2025 9:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 492
according to the state practice laws thereof.
B. Member states shall be authorized to receive, and shall provide, files and
information regarding the investigation and discipline, if any, of licensees in
other member states upon request. Any member state receiving such information
or files shall protect and maintain the security and confidentiality thereof, in at
least the same manner that it maintains its own investigatory or disciplinary files
and information. Prior to disclosing any disciplinary or investigatory information
received from another member state, the disclosing state shall communicate its
intention and purpose for such disclosure to the member state which originally
provided that information.
SECTION 7. ESTABLISHMENT OF THE SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGIST
INTERSTATE LICENSURE COMPACT COMMISSION
A. The member states hereby create and establish a joint government agency whose
membership consists of all member states that have enacted the compact, and this
agency shall be known as the School Psychologist Interstate Licensure Compact
Commission. The commission is an instrumentality of the member states acting
jointly and not an instrumentality of any one (1) state. The commission shall
come into existence on or after the effective date of the compact as set forth in
Section 11 of this compact.
B. Membership, voting, and meetings:
1. Each member state shall have and be limited to one (1) delegate selected by
that member state’s state licensing authority.
2. The delegate shall be the primary administrative officer of the member state
licensing authority or their designee who is an employee of the member
state licensing authority.
3. The commission shall by rule or bylaw establish a term of office for
delegates and may by rule or bylaw establish term limits.
Page 8 of 26
XXXX 11/24/2025 9:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 492
4. The commission may recommend removal or suspension of any delegate
from office.
5. A member state’s licensing authority shall fill any vacancy of its delegate
occurring on the commission within sixty (60) days of the vacancy.
6. Each delegate shall be entitled to one (1) vote on all matters before the
commission requiring a vote by commission delegates.
7. A delegate shall vote in person or by such other means as provided in the
bylaws. The bylaws may provide for delegates to meet by
telecommunication, videoconference, or other means of communication.
8. The commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year.
Additional meetings may be held as set forth in the bylaws. The commission
may meet by telecommunication, videoconference or other similar
electronic means.
C. The commission shall have the following powers:
1. Establish the fiscal year of the commission;
2. Establish code of conduct and conflict of interest policies;
3. Establish and amend rules and bylaws;
4. Establish the procedure through which a licensee may change their home
state;
5. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
6. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this
compact, the commission’s rules, and the bylaws;
7. Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the name of the
commission, provided that the standing of any member state licensing
authority to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected;
8. Maintain and certify records and information provided to a member state as
the authenticated business records of the commission, and designate an
Page 9 of 26
XXXX 11/24/2025 9:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 492
agent to do so on the commission's behalf;
9. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
10. Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel, including but not
limited to employees of a member state;
11. Conduct an annual financial review;
12. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties,
grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the
compact, and establish the commission’s personnel policies and programs
relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and other
related personnel matters;
13. Assess and collect fees;
14. Accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations, grants of money, other
sources of revenue, equipment, supplies, materials, and services, and
receive, utilize, and dispose of the same, provided that at all times the
commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety and/or conflict of
interest;
15. Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any property, real,
personal, or mixed, or any undivided interest therein;
16. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise
dispose of any property real, personal, or mixed;
17. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
18. Borrow money;
19. Appoint committees, including standing committees, composed of members,
state regulators, state legislators or their representatives, and consumer
representatives, and such other interested persons as may be designated in
this compact and the bylaws;
20. Provide and receive information from, and cooperate with, law enforcement
Page 10 of 26
XXXX 11/24/2025 9:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 492
agencies;
21. Establish and elect an executive committee, including a chair and a vice
chair;
22. Determine whether a state’s adopted language is materially different from
the model compact language such that the state would not qualify for
participation in the compact; and
23. Perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve
the purposes of this compact.
D. The executive committee:
1. The executive committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the
commission according to the terms of this compact. The powers, duties, and
responsibilities of the executive committee shall include:
a. Oversee the day-to-day activities of the administration of the compact
including enforcement and compliance with the provisions of the
compact, its rules and bylaws, and other such duties as deemed
necessary;
b. Recommend to the commission changes to the rules or bylaws,
changes to this compact legislation, fees charged to member states,
fees charged to licensees, and other fees;
c. Ensure compact administration services are appropriately provided,
including by contract;
d. Prepare and recommend the budget;
e. Maintain financial records on behalf of the commission;
f. Monitor compact compliance of member states, and provide
compliance reports to the commission;
g. Establish additional committees as necessary;
h. Exercise the powers and duties of the commission during the interim
Page 11 of 26
XXXX 11/24/2025 9:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 492
between commission meetings, except for adopting or amending rules,
adopting or amending bylaws, and exercising any other powers and
duties expressly reserved to the commission by rule or bylaw; and
i. Other duties as provided in the rules or bylaws of the commission.
2. The executive committee shall be composed of up to seven (7) members:
a. The chair and vice chair of the commission shall be voting members
of the executive committee; and
b. The commission shall elect five (5) voting members from the current
membership of the commission.
3. The commission may remove any member of the executive committee as
provided in the commission’s bylaws.
4. The executive committee shall meet at least annually.
a. Executive committee meetings shall be open to the public, except that
the executive committee may meet in a closed, non-public meeting as
provided in subsection F.2. of this section.
b. The executive committee shall give thirty (30) days’ notice of its
meetings, posted on its website and as determined to provide notice to
persons with an interest in the business of the commission.
c. The executive committee may hold a special meeting in accordance
with subsection F.1.b. of this section.
E. The commission shall adopt and provide to the member states an annual report.
F. Meetings of the commission:
1. All meetings shall be open to the public, except that the commission may
meet in a closed, non-public meeting as provided in subsection F.2. of this
section.
a. Public notice for all meetings of the full commission shall be given in
the same manner as required under the rulemaking provisions in
Page 12 of 26
XXXX 11/24/2025 9:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 492
Section 9 of this compact, except that the commission may hold a
special meeting as provided in subsection F.1.b. of this section.
b. The commission may hold a special meeting when it must meet to
conduct emergency business by giving forty-eight (48) hours’ notice to
all commissioners, on the commission’s website, and other means as
provided in the commission’s rules. The commission’s legal counsel
shall certify that the commission’s need to meet qualifies as an
emergency.
2. The commission or the executive committee or other committees of the
commission may convene in a closed, non-public meeting for the
commission or executive committee or other committees of the commission
to receive legal advice or to discuss:
a. Non-compliance of a member state with its obligations under the
compact;
b. The employment, compensation, discipline or other matters, practices
or procedures related to specific employees;
c. Current or threatened discipline of a licensee by the commission or by
a member state’s licensing authority;
d. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation;
e. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of goods,
services, or real estate;
f. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
g. Trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged
or confidential;
h. Information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a
clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
i. Investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
Page 13 of 26
XXXX 11/24/2025 9:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 492
j. Information related to any investigative reports prepared by or on
behalf of or for use of the commission or other committee charged
with responsibility of investigation or determination of compliance
issues pursuant to the compact;
k. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or member
state law; or
l. Other matters as promulgated by the commission by rule.
3. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the presiding officer shall
state that the meeting will be closed and reference each relevant exempting
provision, and such reference shall be recorded in the minutes.
4. The commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly describe all
matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate
summary of actions taken, and the reasons therefore, including a
description of the views expressed. All documents considered in connection
with an action shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and
documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release
only by a majority vote of the commission or order of a court of competent
jurisdiction.
G. Financing of the commission:
1. The commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable
expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing activities.
2. The commission may accept any and all appropriate revenue sources as
provided in subsection C.14. of this section.
3. The commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from each
member state and impose fees on licensees practicing in the member states
under an equivalent license to cover the cost of the operations and activities
of the commission and its staff, which must be in a total amount sufficient
Page 14 of 26
XXXX 11/24/2025 9:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 492
to cover its annual budget as approved each year for which revenue is not
provided by other sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount for
member states shall be allocated based upon a formula that the commission
shall promulgate by rule.
4. The commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing
the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the commission pledge the
credit of any of the member states, except by and with the authority of the
member state.
5. The commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and
disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the commission shall be
subject to the financial review and accounting procedures established under
its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the
commission shall be subject to an annual financial review by a certified or
licensed public accountant, and the report of the financial review shall be
included in and become part of the annual report of the commission.
H. Qualified immunity, defense, and indemnification:
1. The members, officers, executive director, employees and representatives of
the commission shall be immune from suit and liability, both personally and
in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or
personal injury or other civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual
or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred, or that the person against
whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred
within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities;
provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to protect any
such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability
caused by the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person.
The procurement of insurance of any type by the commission shall not in
Page 15 of 26
XXXX 11/24/2025 9:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 492
any way compromise or limit the immunity granted hereunder.
2. The commission shall defend any member, officer, executive director,
employee, and representative of the commission in any civil action seeking
to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission
that occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties, or
responsibilities, or as determined by the commission that the person against
whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred
within the scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities;
provided that nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from
retaining their own counsel at their own expense; and provided further, that
the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that person’s
intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
3. The commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member, officer,
executive director, employee, and representative of the commission for the
amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against that person arising
out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the
scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such
person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of
commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual
or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from the intentional or
willful or wanton misconduct of that person.
4. Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the liability of any
licensee for professional malpractice or misconduct, which shall be
governed solely by any other applicable state laws.
5. Nothing in this compact shall be interpreted to waive or otherwise abrogate
a member state’s state action immunity or state action affirmative defense
with respect to antitrust claims under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or any
Page 16 of 26
XXXX 11/24/2025 9:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 492
other state or federal antitrust or anticompetitive law or regulation.
6. Nothing in this compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign
immunity by the member states or by the commission.
SECTION 8. FACILITATING INFORMATION EXCHANGE
A. The commission shall provide for facilitating the exchange of information to
administer and implement the provisions of this compact in accordance with the
rules of the commission, consistent with generally accepted data protection
principles.
B. Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the contrary, a member state
shall agree to provide for the facilitation of the following licensee information as
required by the rules of the commission, including:
1. Identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
3. Adverse actions against a license and information related thereto;
4. Non-confidential information related to alternative program participation,
the beginning and ending dates of such participation, and other information
related to such participation not made confidential under member state law;
5. Any denial of application for licensure, and the reason(s) for such denial;
6. The presence of investigative information; and
7. Other information that may facilitate the administration of this compact or
the protection of the public, as determined by the rules of the commission.
C. Nothing in this compact shall be deemed or construed to alter, limit, or inhibit the
power of a member state to control and maintain ownership of its licensee
information or alter, limit, or inhibit the laws or regulations governing licensee
information in the member state.
SECTION 9. RULEMAKING
A. The commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria set
Page 17 of 26
XXXX 11/24/2025 9:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 492
forth in this interstate compact and the rules adopted thereunder. Rules and
amendments shall become binding as of the date specified in each rule or
amendment.
B. The commission shall promulgate reasonable rules to achieve the intent and
purpose of this interstate compact. In the event the commission exercises its
rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond purpose and intent of this
interstate compact, or the powers granted hereunder, then such an action by the
commission shall be invalid and have no force and effect of law in the member
states.
C. If a majority of the legislatures of the member states rejects a rule, by enactment
of a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the compact within
four (4) years of the date of adoption of the rule, then such rule shall have no
further force and effect in any member state.
D. Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted or ratified at a regular or
special meeting of the commission in accordance with commission rules and
bylaws.
E. Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final rule or rules by the commission,
and at least thirty (30) days in advance of the meeting at which the rule will be
considered and voted upon, the commission shall file a notice of proposed
rulemaking:
1. On the website of the commission or other publicly accessible platform; and
2. On the website of each member state licensing authority or other publicly
accessible platform or the publication in which each state would otherwise
publish proposed rules.
F. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the commission may consider and
adopt an emergency rule with forty-eight (48) hours’ notice, with opportunity to
comment, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures shall be retroactively
Page 18 of 26
XXXX 11/24/2025 9:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 492
applied to the rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety
(90) days after the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an
emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of commission or member state funds;
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an administrative rule that is
established by federal law or rule; or
4. Protect public health and safety.
SECTION 10. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT
A. Oversight:
1. The executive and judicial branches of the state government in each
member state shall enforce this compact and take all actions necessary and
appropriate to implement the compact.
2. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the commission shall
be brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where
the principal office of the commission is located. The commission may
waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to
participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing herein
shall affect or limit the selection or propriety of venue in any action against
a licensee for professional malpractice, misconduct or any such similar
matter.
3. The commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in any
proceeding regarding the enforcement or interpretation of the compact and
shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes.
Failure to provide the commission service of process shall render a
judgment or order void as to the commission, this compact, or promulgated
rules.
Page 19 of 26
XXXX 11/24/2025 9:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 492
B. Default, technical assistance, and termination:
1. If the commission determines that a member state has defaulted in the
performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this compact or the
promulgated rules, the commission shall provide written notice to the
defaulting state. The notice of default shall describe the default, the
proposed means of curing the default, and any other action that the
commission may take, and shall offer training and specific technical
assistance regarding the default.
2. The commission shall provide a copy of the notice of default to the other
member states.
C. If a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state may be
terminated from the compact upon an affirmative vote of a supermajority of the
delegates of the member states, and all rights, privileges and benefits conferred
on that state by this compact may be terminated on the effective date of
termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending state of
obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default.
D. Termination of membership in the compact shall be imposed only after all other
means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend
or terminate shall be given by the commission to the governor, the majority and
minority leaders of the defaulting state’s legislature, the defaulting state’s
licensing authority, and each of the member states’ licensing authorities.
E. A state that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations,
and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, including
obligations that extend beyond the effective date of termination.
F. Upon the termination of a state’s membership from this compact, that state shall
immediately provide notice to all licensees within that state of such termination.
The terminated state shall continue to recognize all licenses granted pursuant to
Page 20 of 26
XXXX 11/24/2025 9:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 492
this compact for a minimum of six (6) months after the date of said notice of
termination.
G. The commission shall not bear any costs related to a state that is found to be in
default or that has been terminated from the compact, unless agreed upon in
writing between the commission and the defaulting state.
H. The defaulting state may appeal the action of the commission by petitioning the
United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district
where the commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party shall be
awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
I. Dispute resolution:
1. Upon request by a member state, the commission shall attempt to resolve
disputes related to the compact that arise among member states and between
member and non-member states.
2. The commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both mediation and
binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
J. Enforcement:
1. By majority vote as provided by rule, the commission may initiate legal
action against a member state in default in the United States District Court
for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the commission
has its principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the
compact and its promulgated rules. The relief sought may include both
injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is
necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation,
including reasonable attorney’s fees. The remedies herein shall not be the
exclusive remedies of the commission. The commission may pursue any
other remedies available under federal or the defaulting member state’s law.
2. A member state may initiate legal action against the commission in the
Page 21 of 26
XXXX 11/24/2025 9:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 492
United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal
district where the Commission has its principal offices to enforce
compliance with the provisions of the compact and its promulgated rules.
The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the
event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be
awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
3. No person other than a member state shall enforce this compact against the
commission.
SECTION 11. EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT
A. The compact shall come into effect on the date on which the compact statute is
enacted into law in the seventh member state.
1. On or after the effective date of the compact indicated above, the
commission shall convene and review the enactment of each of the charter
member states to determine if the statute enacted by each such charter
member state is materially different than the model compact statute.
a. A charter member state whose enactment is found to be materially
different from the model compact statute shall be entitled to the
default process set forth in Section 10 of this compact.
b. If any member state is later found to be in default, or is terminated or
withdraws from the compact, the commission shall remain in
existence and the compact shall remain in effect even if the number of
member states should be less than seven (7).
2. Member states enacting the compact subsequent to the charter member
states shall be subject to the process set forth in Section 7.C.22. of this
compact to determine if their enactments are materially different from the
model compact statute and whether they qualify for participation in the
compact.
Page 22 of 26
XXXX 11/24/2025 9:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 492
3. All actions taken for the benefit of the commission or in furtherance of the
purposes of the administration of the compact prior to the effective date of
the compact or the commission coming into existence shall be considered to
be actions of the commission unless specifically repudiated by the
commission.
a. Any state that joins the compact subsequent to the commission’s initial
adoption of the rules and bylaws shall be subject to the rules and
bylaws as they exist on the date on which the compact becomes law in
that state. Any rule that has been previously adopted by the
commission shall have the full force and effect of law on the day the
compact becomes law in that state.
b. Any member state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a
statute repealing the same.
B. A member state’s withdrawal shall not take effect until one hundred eighty (180)
days after enactment of the repealing statute.
C. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing
state’s licensing authority to comply with the investigative and adverse action
reporting requirements of this compact prior to the effective date of withdrawal.
D. Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this compact, a state shall
immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all licensees within that state.
Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory enactment to the contrary, such
withdrawing state shall continue to recognize all licenses granted pursuant to this
compact for a minimum of six (6) months after the date of such notice of
withdrawal.
1. Nothing contained in this compact shall be construed to invalidate or
prevent any licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between
a member state and a non-member state that does not conflict with the
Page 23 of 26
XXXX 11/24/2025 9:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 492
provisions of this compact.
2. This compact may be amended by the member states. No amendment to this
compact shall become effective and binding upon any member state until it
is enacted into the laws of all member states.
SECTION 12. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
A. This compact and the commission’s rulemaking authority shall be liberally
construed so as to effectuate the purposes, and the implementation and
administration of the compact. Provisions of the compact expressly authorizing or
requiring the promulgation of rules shall not be construed to limit the
commission’s rulemaking authority solely for those purposes.
B. The provisions of this compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause,
sentence or provision of this compact is held by a court of competent jurisdiction
to be contrary to the constitution of any member state, a state seeking
participation in the compact, or of the United States, or the applicability thereof
to any government, agency, person or circumstance is held to be unconstitutional
by a court of competent jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of this compact
and the applicability thereof to any other government, agency, person or
circumstance shall not be affected thereby.
C. Notwithstanding subsection B. of this section, the commission may deny a state’s
participation in the compact or, in accordance with the requirements of Section
10.B. of this compact, terminate a member state’s participation in the compact, if
it determines that a constitutional requirement of a member state is a material
departure from the compact. Otherwise, if this compact shall be held to be
contrary to the constitution of any member state, the compact shall remain in full
force and effect as to the remaining member states and in full force and effect as
to the member state affected as to all severable matters.
SECTION 13. CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE
Page 24 of 26
XXXX 11/24/2025 9:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 492
LAWS
A. Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any other law of a
member state that is not inconsistent with the compact.
B. Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a member state in
conflict with the compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.
C. All permissible agreements between the commission and the member states are
binding in accordance with their terms.
SECTION 14. APPLICABILITY OF KENTUCKY STATE GOVERNMENT
In order to clarify the effect of certain provisions of this compact and to ensure that the
rights and responsibilities of the various branches of government are maintained, the
following shall be in effect in this state:
A. By entering into this compact, this state authorizes the state licensing authority as
defined in Section 2.CC. of this compact and as created by KRS 161.028 to
implement the provisions of this compact.
B. Notwithstanding any provision of this compact to the contrary:
1. When a rule is adopted pursuant to Section 9 of this compact, the state
licensing authority as defined by Section 2.CC. of this compact shall have
sixty (60) days to review the rule for the purpose of filing the rule as an
emergency administrative regulation pursuant to KRS 13A.190 and for
filing the rule as an accompanying ordinary administrative regulation,
following the requirements of KRS Chapter 13A. Failure by the state
licensing authority as defined by Section 2.CC. of this compact to
promulgate a rule adopted by the School Psychologist Interstate Licensure
Compact Commission as an administrative regulation pursuant to KRS
Chapter 13A shall result in withdrawal as set forth in Section 11 of this
compact. Nothing in these provisions shall negate the applicability of a
commission rule or Section 9 of this compact to this state;
Page 25 of 26
XXXX 11/24/2025 9:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 492
2. If the proposed administrative regulation is found deficient and the
deficiency is not resolved pursuant to KRS 13A.330 or 13A.335, the
provisions of Section 10 of this compact shall apply. If the deficiency is
resolved in a manner determined by the commission to be inconsistent with
this compact or its rules, or if the procedures under Section 10 of this
compact fail to resolve an issue, the withdrawal provisions of Section 11 of
this compact shall apply; and
3. If a court of competent jurisdiction determines that the School Psychologist
Interstate Licensure Compact Commission created by Section 7 of this
compact exercises its rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond the
scope of the purposes of this compact, or the powers granted under this
compact, then such an action by the commission shall be invalid and have
no force or effect.
C. Section 7.G. of this compact pertaining to the financing of the commission shall
not be interpreted to obligate the general fund of this state. Any funds used to
finance this compact shall be from money collected pursuant to KRS 161.028.
D. This compact shall apply only to those school psychologists who practice or work
under a compact privilege.
Page 26 of 26
XXXX 11/24/2025 9:49 AM Jacketed